Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB30.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 190.058 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Motor Vehicle Commission is hereby created as an agency of the Commonwealth to carry out the
functions and duties conferred upon it by this section.
(2) The commission shall consist of twelve (12) members, eleven (11) of whom shall be appointed by the
Governor, and the twelfth shall be the commissioner of the Department of Vehicle Regulation. The appointed
members shall be:
(a) One (1) representative of an automobile manufacturer;
(b) One (1) representative of automobile wholesalers;
(c) One (1) representative of consumers who shall have no direct financial interest in the industry;
(d) Four (4) new motor vehicle dealers, but no more than two (2) shall represent the same automobile
manufacturer as a franchise dealer; and
(e) Four (4) used motor vehicle dealers.
(3) In addition to the requirements of membership on the commission in subsection (2) of this section, the
following requirements shall apply to the composition of the commission:
(a) No more than seven (7) members shall be from the same political party; and
(b) From the eight (8) members specified in subsection (2)(d) and (e) of this section, seven (7) shall be
from separate Supreme Court districts.
(4) Each member shall serve for a term of three (3) years. The staggered terms of membership dating from the
gubernatorial appointments of July 15, 1982, shall remain in effect.
(5) (a) Members of the commission shall qualify by taking the constitutional oath of office which shall, with
the certificate of appointment, be evidence of the authority of the member to act.
(b) Each member of the commission shall be entitled to two hundred dollars ($200) per day for each day
actually engaged in the duties of the office, including time spent in necessary travel to and from
meetings and otherwise, together with all travel and other necessary expenses incurred while
performing official duties.
(6) The commission shall hold a regular annual meeting in September of each year and elect a
chairperson[chairman] and vice chairperson[chairman] to serve for the ensuing year. The commission shall
have regular meetings as the majority of the members specifies and special meetings at the request of any five
(5) members. Reasonable notice of all meetings shall be given as commission administrative regulations
prescribe.
(7) A member of the commission shall not participate in the deliberations of the commission and shall not vote on
any matter before the commission in which the member has a financial interest or is an interested party. A
member shall voluntarily disqualify himself or herself from deliberating or voting upon matters that affect the
member but shall not be required to disqualify from matters of general interest affecting the member, the
member's employer, or a business unit in which the member has a financial interest as a member of a class of
persons to be affected by an administrative regulation or order of the commission.
(8) A majority of the commissioners, excluding any disqualified commissioner, shall constitute a quorum for the
transaction of any business, for the performance of any duty, or for the exercise of any power of the
commission. A vacancy in the commission, whether due to disqualification or otherwise, shall not impair the
right of the remaining commissioners to exercise all the powers of the commission.
(9) The commission shall employ an executive director who shall be the chief administrative officer of the
commission. The executive director[He] shall maintain all minutes of the commission proceedings and shall
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
be custodian of the files and records of the commission. The executive director shall employ the staff
authorized by the commission. The commission may, by interagency contract, utilize assistance of any state
agency.
(10) (a) There is hereby created in the state treasury a trust and agency account to be known as the motor
vehicle commission fund. The fund shall consist of all license fees paid to the commission under this
chapter, state appropriations, gifts, grants, and federal funds.
(b) The fund shall be administered by the commission.
(c) Amounts deposited in the fund shall be used for carrying out the duties of the commission under this
chapter.
(d) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, fund amounts not expended at the close of a fiscal year shall not lapse
but shall be carried forward into the next fiscal year[The commission shall deposit all moneys
received by it from license fees paid under this law with the State Treasurer, who shall keep them in a
separate fund to be known as the "Motor Vehicle Commission Fund." The commission may use this
fund for salaries, wages, per diem, professional and consulting fees, grants, loans, contracts, travel
expenses, equipment, office rent and expenses, and other necessary expenses incurred in carrying out its
duties under this section as provided by legislative appropriation. Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, at the
close of each biennium, the unexpended balance remaining in the motor vehicle commission fund shall
not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next biennium].
(11) The commission shall administer the provisions of this section, establish the qualifications of manufacturers
and dealers, and ensure that the distribution and sale of new motor vehicles are conducted as provided in this
chapter and under the commission's administrative regulations.
(12) The commission may issue orders and make determinations necessary to carry out the provisions of KRS
190.010 to 190.080. The orders shall set forth the findings on which the order is based, and the reason for the
particular action taken. All orders shall be signed by the chairperson[chairman] or vice
chairperson[chairman] and attested by the executive director.
(13) The commission may hold hearings that shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B. A member
of the commission shall not participate in the deliberations of the commission and shall not vote on any matter
if the member has been disqualified on any of the grounds under KRS 13B.040.
(14) The commission may cause legal proceedings to be instituted to enforce the provisions of this section and its
administrative regulations, orders, and decisions. If it appears from any investigation of a possible violation of
any other law or administrative regulation that a violation of the provisions of KRS 190.010 to 190.080 may
have occurred, the matter shall be referred to the commission to determine whether proceedings under KRS
190.010 to 190.080 are appropriate. The commission may make contracts and execute instruments necessary
or convenient to the exercise of its power or performance of its duties.
(15) The availability of administrative procedures under this section shall not preclude the utilization of other
remedies for violation of the provisions of this chapter which are available to the affected parties, including
actions for injunctive relief.
Section 2. KRS 189.222 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet in respect to
highways which are a part of the state-maintained system, by official order, may increase on designated
highways or portions thereof, the maximum height, length, and gross weight prescribed in KRS 189.221, if in
the opinion of the secretary, the increased height, length, and weight designated by him or her are justified by
the strength, safety, and durability of the designated highways, and the highways do not appear susceptible to
unreasonable and unusual damage by reason of the increases and the secretary may establish reasonable
classification of state maintained roads and fix a different maximum for each classification. Any increase in
the height, length, or width of any motor truck or tractor semitrailer combinations or any other vehicle
combinations including any part of the body or load or designation of highways to be used by the vehicles,
shall not, in any way, exceed the federal law or regulations thereunder or jeopardize the allotment or
qualification for federal aid funds of the Commonwealth of Kentucky or exceed the following dimensions and
weights:
(a) 1. Height, for vehicles transporting motor vehicles, fourteen (14) feet; and
2. Height, for all other vehicles, thirteen and one-half (13-1/2) feet;

CHAPTER 133 3
(b) Length, semitrailers, fifty-three (53) feet; trailers, twenty-eight (28) feet; motor trucks, forty-five (45)
feet, not to exceed two (2) trailers per truck tractor;
(c) Weight, twenty thousand (20,000) pounds per single axle, with axles less than forty-two (42) inches
apart to be considered as a single axle; thirty-four thousand (34,000) pounds on two (2) axles in tandem
arrangement which are spaced forty-two (42) inches or more apart and less than ninety-six (96) inches
apart; forty-eight thousand (48,000) pounds on three (3) axles which are spaced forty-two (42) inches or
more apart and less than one hundred twenty (120) inches apart. No single axle in any arrangement
shall exceed twenty thousand (20,000) pounds or seven hundred (700) pounds per inch of the aggregate
width of all the tires on a single axle, whichever is less. The total gross weight of the vehicle and load
shall not exceed eighty thousand (80,000) pounds;
(d) Except on the interstate highway system, a tolerance of not more than five percent (5%) per axle load
shall be permitted before a carrier is deemed to have violated paragraph (c) of this subsection. The gross
weight shall not exceed eighty thousand (80,000) pounds;
(e) Except as provided for in paragraph (f) of this subsection, truck tractor, semitrailer and trailer
combinations, and other vehicle combinations may be operated only on the interstate system and on
those parts of the federal aid highway system and the state-maintained system which have been
designated by the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet by official order as safely allowing same; and
(f) A vehicle or combination of vehicles that is one hundred two (102) inches wide or less and has a gross
weight of not more than eighty thousand (80,000) pounds may be driven on any state highway, for a
distance of up to fifteen (15) miles from an interstate or parkway exit.
(2) In addition to the provisions of KRS 189.2226, vehicles with a gross weight of up to eighty thousand (80,000)
pounds may travel on any state highway in the Commonwealth without obtaining a special permit, if the
weight does not exceed any limits mandated by federal law or regulation, any posted bridge weight limit, or
the weight limits for the size and type of vehicle established under subsection (1)(c) of this section, and if the
vehicle is transporting any of the following:
(a) Meats or agricultural crop products originating from a farm to first market;
(b) Livestock or poultry from their point of origin to first market. As used in this paragraph and in
paragraph (d) of this subsection, "livestock" means cattle, sheep, swine, goats, horses, alpacas, llamas,
buffaloes, or any other animals of the bovine, ovine, porcine, caprine, equine, or camelid species;
(c) Primary forest products, including, but not limited to, sawdust, wood chips, bark, slabs, or logs
originating from their points of origin to first market; or
(d) Supplies, materials, or equipment necessary to carry out a farming operation engaged in the production
of agricultural crop products, meats, livestock, or poultry.
(3) The following vehicles registered under KRS 186.050 may exceed the gross weight provisions set forth in
subsection (1)(c) of this section by a weight tolerance of ten percent (10%), except on the interstate highway
system:
(a) Vehicles that are engaged exclusively in the transportation of items listed in subsection (2)(a), (b), and
(c) of this section; and
(b) Vehicles that are engaged exclusively in the transportation of feed for livestock or poultry.
(4) (a) Notwithstanding KRS 189.269, vehicles with a gross weight of up to ninety thousand (90,000) pounds
transporting fluid milk originating from a farm to first market may travel on any state highway in the
Commonwealth without obtaining a special permit, except that:
1. The weight of the vehicle and load under this subsection shall not exceed any limits mandated
by federal law or regulation, or any posted bridge weight limit; and
2. A vehicle being operated on the interstate highway system shall not exceed eighty thousand
(80,000) pounds.
(b) A vehicle may exceed the weight provisions established by this subsection by a weight tolerance of ten
percent (10%), except on the interstate highway system.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(5) Vehicles exclusively engaged in the transportation of motor vehicles, unmanufactured tobacco, or
unmanufactured tobacco products may, on those highways which are a part of the state-maintained system and
which have been designated by the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet by official order as safely allowing
same, attain the maximum lengths as provided by subsection (1)(b) of this section, excluding the usual and
ordinary bumper overhang of the transported vehicles.
(6)[(5)] Vehicles engaged exclusively in the transportation of farm or primary forestry products and registered
under KRS 186.050(4) or 186.050(9) and vehicles engaged exclusively in the transportation of ready-mixed
concrete shall be excluded from the axle weight provisions, except on interstate highways, and subject only to
total gross weight provisions.
(7)[(6)] Vehicles registered pursuant to KRS 186.050(3)(b) and engaged in the transportation of primary forest
products, including, but not limited to, vehicles transporting sawdust, wood chips, bark, slabs, or logs, may
exceed the axle, or gross weight provisions as set forth in accordance with subsection (1)(c) of this section by a
weight tolerance of ten percent (10%), except on the interstate highway system.
(8)[(7)] Vehicles designed for and engaged exclusively in the collection and hauling of refuse and registered
under KRS 186.050(3)(b) shall be excluded from the axle weight provisions, except when in operation on the
federal interstate system, and subject only to total gross weight provisions.
(9)[(8)] The secretary of the Transportation Cabinet may by order increase the weight and height limits
prescribed by this chapter for motor vehicles while being operated exclusively on roads or highways being
constructed, reconstructed, or repaired under contract with the Transportation Cabinet by the contractor or
subcontractor, agent, or employee thereof.
(10)[(9)] Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet shall not
authorize the operation of any vehicle or combination of vehicles, upon any part of the federal aid highway
system or state parkway system, which exceeds the following dimensions and weights:
(a) Width, one hundred two (102) inches, including any part of the body or load; or
(b) Weight, twenty thousand (20,000) pounds per single axle, with axles less than forty-two (42) inches
apart to be considered as a single axle; thirty-four thousand (34,000) pounds on two (2) axles in tandem
arrangement which are spaced forty-two (42) inches or more apart and less than ninety-six (96) inches
apart; forty-eight thousand (48,000) pounds on three (3) axles which are spaced forty-two (42) inches or
more apart and less than one hundred twenty (120) inches apart. The total gross weight of the vehicle
and load shall not exceed eighty thousand (80,000) pounds. If any federal law or laws or regulations
thereunder are hereafter enacted authorizing weights and dimensions in excess of those set out in
paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet may by official
order increase the maximum weights and dimensions but the increased weights and dimensions shall
not exceed those set out in this section.
(11)[(10)] Except on the interstate highway system, vehicles engaged exclusively in the transportation of crushed
stone, fill dirt and rock, soil, bulk sand, coal, phosphate muck, asphalt, concrete, solid waste, tankage or animal
residues, livestock, feed for livestock or poultry, and agricultural products shall be permitted a tolerance of ten
percent (10%) of the axle weight provisions before a carrier is deemed to have violated subsection (1)(c) of
this section.
(12)[(11)] For any vehicle which is equipped with an auxiliary power unit, the weight limits set forth in this
section shall be increased by four hundred (400) pounds.
(13)[(12)] The Transportation Cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with[pursuant to]
KRS Chapter 13A, relating to the implementation of 23 C.F.R. pt. 658 as it relates to state-maintained or
locally maintained roads. The enforcement of the provisions of KRS 189.221 and this section on locally
maintained roads shall not be the responsibility of the law enforcement officers of the Transportation Cabinet,
unless the head of the corresponding local government unit has requested, in writing, enforcement assistance
from the Transportation Cabinet.
Section 3. KRS 189.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Department" means the Department of Highways;
(2) "Crosswalk" means:

CHAPTER 133 5
(a) That part of a roadway at an intersection within the connections of the lateral lines of the sidewalks on
opposite sides of the highway measured from the curbs or in the absence of curbs, from the edges of the
traversable roadway; or
(b) Any portion of a roadway at an intersection or elsewhere distinctly indicated for pedestrian crossing by
lines or other markings on the surface;
(3) "Highway" means any public road, street, avenue, alley or boulevard, bridge, viaduct, or trestle and the
approaches to them and includes private residential roads and parking lots covered by an agreement under
KRS 61.362, off-street parking facilities offered for public use, whether publicly or privately owned, except
for-hire parking facilities listed in KRS 189.700;
(4) "Intersection" means:
(a) The area embraced within the prolongation or connection of the lateral curb lines, or, if none, then the
lateral boundary lines of the roadways of two (2) highways which join one another, but do not
necessarily continue, at approximately right angles, or the area within which vehicles traveling upon
different highways joining at any other angle may come into conflict; or
(b) Where a highway includes two (2) roadways thirty (30) feet or more apart, then every crossing of each
roadway of such divided highway by an intersecting highway shall be regarded as a separate
intersection. If the intersecting highway also includes two (2) roadways thirty (30) feet or more apart,
every crossing of two (2) roadways of the highways shall be regarded as a separate intersection. The
junction of a private alley with a public street or highway shall not constitute an intersection;
(5) "Manufactured home" has the same meaning as defined in KRS 186.650;
(6) "Motor truck" means any motor-propelled vehicle designed for carrying freight or merchandise. It shall not
include self-propelled vehicles designed primarily for passenger transportation but equipped with frames,
racks, or bodies having a load capacity of not exceeding one thousand (1,000) pounds;
(7) "Operator" means the person in actual physical control of a vehicle;
(8) "Pedestrian" means any person afoot or in a wheelchair;
(9) "Right-of-way" means the right of one (1) vehicle or pedestrian to proceed in a lawful manner in preference to
another vehicle or pedestrian approaching under such circumstances of direction, speed, and proximity as to
give rise to danger of collision unless one grants precedence to the other;
(10) "Roadway" means that portion of a highway improved, designed, or ordinarily used for vehicular travel,
exclusive of the berm or shoulder. If a highway includes two (2) or more separate roadways, the term
"roadway" as used herein shall refer to any roadway separately but not to all such roadways collectively;
(11) "Safety zone" means the area or space officially set apart within a roadway for the exclusive use of pedestrians
and which is protected or is so marked or indicated by adequate signs as to be plainly visible at all times while
set apart as a safety zone;
(12) "Semitrailer" means a vehicle designed to be attached to, and having its front end supported by, a motor truck
or truck tractor, intended for the carrying of freight or merchandise and having a load capacity of over one
thousand (1,000) pounds;
(13) "Truck tractor" means any motor-propelled vehicle designed to draw and to support the front end of a
semitrailer. The semitrailer and the truck tractor shall be considered to be one (1) unit;
(14) "Sharp curve" means a curve of not less than thirty (30) degrees;
(15) "State Police" includes any agency for the enforcement of the highway laws established pursuant to law;
(16) "Steep grade" means a grade exceeding seven percent (7%);
(17) "Trailer" means any vehicle designed to be drawn by a motor truck or truck-tractor, but supported wholly upon
its own wheels, intended for the carriage of freight or merchandise and having a load capacity of over one
thousand (1,000) pounds;
(18) "Unobstructed highway" means a straight, level, first-class road upon which no other vehicle is passing or
attempting to pass and upon which no other vehicle or pedestrian is approaching in the opposite direction,
closer than three hundred (300) yards;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(19) (a) "Vehicle" includes:
1. All agencies for the transportation of persons or property over or upon the public highways of the
Commonwealth; and
2. All vehicles passing over or upon the highways.
(b) "Motor vehicle" includes all vehicles, as defined in paragraph (a) of this subsection, except:
1. Road rollers;
2. Road graders;
3. Farm tractors;
4. Vehicles on which power shovels are mounted;
5. Construction equipment customarily used only on the site of construction and which is not
practical for the transportation of persons or property upon the highways;
6. Vehicles that travel exclusively upon rails;
7. Vehicles propelled by electric power obtained from overhead wires while being operated within
any municipality or where the vehicles do not travel more than five (5) miles beyond the city
limits of any municipality;
8. Vehicles propelled by muscular power; and
9. Electric low-speed scooters;
(20) "Reflectance" means the ratio of the amount of total light, expressed in a percentage, which is reflected
outward by the product or material to the amount of total light falling on the product or material;
(21) "Sunscreening material" means a product or material, including film, glazing, and perforated sunscreening,
which, when applied to the windshield or windows of a motor vehicle, reduces the effects of the sun with
respect to light reflectance or transmittance;
(22) "Transmittance" means the ratio of the amount of total light, expressed in a percentage, which is allowed to
pass through the product or material, including glazing, to the amount of total light falling on the product or
material and the glazing;
(23) "Window" means any device designed for exterior viewing from a motor vehicle, except the windshield, any
roof-mounted viewing device, and any viewing device having less than one hundred fifty (150) square inches
in area;
(24) "All-terrain vehicle" means any motor vehicle used for recreational off-road use;
(25) "Nondivisible load," as pertains to:
(a) State highways that are not part of the national truck network established pursuant to 23 C.F.R. pt. 658,
means a load or vehicle, that if separated into smaller loads or vehicles:
1.[(a)] Compromises the intended use of the vehicle, making it unable to perform the function for which
it was intended;
2.[(b)] Destroys the value of the load or vehicle, making it unusable for its intended purpose; or
3.[(c)] Requires more than four (4) work hours to dismantle and reassemble using appropriate
equipment; or
(b) Any highway that is part of the national truck network established pursuant to 23 C.F.R. pt. 658,
includes fluid milk products in accordance with 23 U.S.C. sec. 127(a)(13);
(26) "Electric low-speed scooter" means a device that:
(a) Weighs less than one hundred (100) pounds;
(b) Is equipped with wheels;
(c) Is equipped with handlebars;
(d) Is equipped with a brake adequate enough to stop and park the device;

CHAPTER 133 7
(e) Is designed to be stood or sat upon;
(f) Is propelled by an electric motor, human power, or both; and
(g) Is designed to operate at a maximum speed of twenty (20) miles per hour, on a paved level surface, with
or without human propulsion; and
(27) "Highway work zone" means that portion of a highway and the affected area adjacent to a lane, berm, or
shoulder, including a sidewalk, upon which construction, reconstruction, resurfacing, maintenance, inspection,
or other work of that nature is being conducted by a government agency, private contractor, or utility
company.
Section 4. KRS 189.270 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The department may issue permits for the operation of motor vehicles, manufactured homes,
recreational vehicles, boats, or any other vehicle transporting a nondivisible load, whose gross weight
including load, height, width, or length exceeds the limits prescribed by this chapter or which in other
respects fail to comply with the requirements of this chapter. Permits may be issued by the department
for stated periods, special purposes, and unusual conditions, and upon terms in the interest of public
safety and the preservation of the highways as the department may require.
(b) Subject to the limitations in subsection (4) of this section, the department shall promulgate
administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to set fees for permits established
under this section.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (8) of this section, the department may, at the request of an applicant, issue a
single-trip permit regardless of the type of vehicle or equipment being transported that exceeds the weight or
dimension limits established by this chapter if the load being transported is a nondivisible load.
(3) (a) Except as provided in subsection (8) of this section, the department may, at the request of an applicant,
issue an annual permit regardless of the type of vehicle or equipment being transported that exceeds the
weight or dimension limits established by this chapter if the load being transported is a nondivisible
load.
(b) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection, a[The] vehicle operating under a permit issued
under this subsection shall not exceed sixteen (16) feet in width exclusive of usual and ordinary
overhang, one hundred twenty (120) feet in length including a towing vehicle and trailer combination,
thirteen (13) feet six (6) inches in height, or one hundred sixty thousand (160,000) pounds.
(c) Notwithstanding KRS 189.269, a vehicle transporting fluid milk products under a permit issued
under this subsection shall not exceed one hundred thousand (100,000) pounds.
(4) The department shall establish the following annual permits to transport farm equipment, with the listed fee
limits:
(a) For equipment less than or equal to fourteen (14) feet in width, eighty dollars ($80); and
(b) For equipment that exceeds fourteen (14) feet in width, when transported from a dealership to a farm,
from a farm to a dealership, or from a dealership to a dealership, one hundred fifty dollars ($150).
(5) Permits issued under this section shall be for nondivisible loads and shall be valid statewide; however, the
department may, as a condition of issuing an annual or single-trip permit, limit the overweight or
overdimensional vehicle to specified routes, exclude certain highways, or even cancel an applicant's permit if
an unreasonable risk of accident or an unreasonable impedance of the flow of traffic would result from the
presence of the overweight or overdimensional vehicle. A person who applies for, and accepts, a permit issued
under this section is acknowledging that the Kentucky Transportation Cabinet is not guaranteeing safe passage
of vehicles by issuing the permit. A person who applies for, and accepts, a permit issued under this section
agrees to measure all clearances of highway structures, both laterally and vertically, prior to passage of the
person's vehicles along the routes specified in the permit. A person who applies for, and accepts, a permit
issued under this section is classified as a bare licensee whose duty is to assume sole risk involved in using
Kentucky's highways without warranty of accuracy.
(6) Subject to the limitations of subsection (12) of this section, the department shall promulgate administrative
regulations under KRS Chapter 13A to establish requirements for escort vehicles, safety markings, and other
safety restrictions governing the operation of an overweight or overdimensional vehicle. The department shall
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

8 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
provide each applicant for an annual or single-trip permit issued under this section a copy of all restrictions
associated with the overweight or overdimensional permit at no charge to the applicant. The department shall
be prohibited from raising the permit fee established in subsections (2) and (3) of this section by levying
additional fees for an overweight or overdimensional permit through the administrative regulation process.
(7) (a) Notwithstanding KRS 189.269, the department may, at the request of an applicant who is a transporter
of manufactured housing, issue an annual permit that exceeds the weight or dimension limits
established by this chapter if the load being transported is a nondivisible load.
(b) The vehicle operated shall not exceed sixteen (16) feet in width exclusive of usual and ordinary
overhang, one hundred twenty (120) feet in length including a towing vehicle and trailer combination,
fifteen (15) feet in height, or one hundred sixty thousand (160,000) pounds.
(c) The holder of a permit issued under this subsection shall, when transporting a manufactured home:
1. Abide by all escort requirements, safety markings, and other safety restrictions governing
overweight and overdimensional vehicles; and
2. Equip each truck operating under a permit with global positioning system technology that keeps
a record of locations traveled. The travel records of trucks operating under a permit shall be open
to inspection by the Transportation Cabinet.
(d) Any person with a permit under this subsection who operates a vehicle greater than thirteen (13) feet six
(6) inches in height while operating in a restricted area designated by the Transportation Cabinet shall
be fined one thousand dollars ($1,000).
(8) The cabinet shall not issue an annual permit under this section if the person applying for the permit is eligible
for an annual permit issued under KRS 189.2716 or 189.2717.
(9) The department may require the applicant to give bond, with approved surety, to indemnify the state or
counties against damage to highways or bridges resulting from use by the applicant. The operation of vehicles
in accordance with the terms of the permit issued under this section shall not constitute a violation of this
chapter if the operator has the permit, or an authenticated copy of it, in his or her possession.
(10) Any person transporting a parade float which exceeds the dimensional limits on a highway over which it is
transported shall be required to obtain a permit as required in subsection (2) of this section. If the float is being
used in conjunction with a parade to be held within the boundaries of the Commonwealth, a fee shall not be
assessed by the department to issue the permit.
(11) A person shall not operate any vehicle in violation of the terms of the permit issued under this section.
(12) (a) The cabinet shall not promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to this section that restrict the time
or days of the week when a permit holder may operate on the highway, except that travel may be
limited from 6 a.m. to 9 a.m. and 3 p.m. to 6 p.m. Monday through Friday. In addition to the restrictions
established in this paragraph, any manufactured home being transported by permit issued under this
section shall not travel on any highway after daylight hours Monday through Saturday, or at any time
on Sunday.
(b) The cabinet shall allow a permit holder who has obtained a permit to transport equipment to a work site
to return to the permit holder's place of business immediately after work is completed at the job site,
subject to the limitations of paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) The cabinet shall not promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to this section setting forth escort
vehicle requirements for overdimensional farm implements or vehicles towing overdimensional farm
implements that are more stringent than the following:
1. For a single vehicle and load in excess of twelve (12) feet in width being operated on a two (2)
lane highway, no more than one (1) lead vehicle shall be required;
2. For a single vehicle and load in excess of twelve (12) feet in width being operated on a four (4)
lane highway, no more than one (1) trail vehicle shall be required;
3. For a single vehicle and load in excess of eighty-five (85) feet in length being operated on a two
(2) lane highway, no more than one (1) lead vehicle shall be required;

CHAPTER 133 9
4. For more than one (1) vehicle and load in excess of twelve (12) feet in width or eighty-five (85)
feet in length being operated as a convoy on a two (2) lane highway, no more than one (1) lead
vehicle shall be required;
5. A lead escort vehicle on a two (2) lane highway under this paragraph may also serve as a tow
vehicle;
6. Any distance for lead or trail escort vehicles shall contain provisions allowing for a variance
from that distance due to safety or road conditions; and
7. A vehicle or its escort shall be required to bear a sign declaring that the vehicle is oversized or be
required to use lights, flashers, or flags, but a vehicle or its escort shall not be required to do
both.
Section 5. KRS 189.2717 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Subject to the provisions of KRS 189.222, the department may promulgate administrative regulations
pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A governing the issuance of annual permits for the operation of motor
vehicles transporting nondivisible loads in this Commonwealth whose gross weight exceeds the limits
prescribed by this chapter.
(b) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection, the gross weight of a motor vehicle operating
pursuant to this section shall not exceed one hundred twenty thousand (120,000) pounds.
(c) Notwithstanding KRS 189.269, the gross weight of a motor vehicle transporting fluid milk products
under a permit issued under this section shall not exceed one hundred thousand (100,000) pounds.
(d) The movement of the overweight motor vehicle shall be limited to a specific route set forth on the
annual permit.
(2) Except as provided is subsection (3) of this section, the following axle weights shall not be exceeded in the
loading of a nondivisible load:
(a) Single axle with axles less than forty-two (42) inches apart and being the steering axle with one (1)
wheel on each side of the axle to be considered a single axle shall not be more than fifteen thousand
(15,000) pounds;
(b) Two (2) axles in tandem arrangement which are spaced forty-two (42) inches or more apart and less
than ninety-six (96) inches apart shall not be more than forty thousand (40,000) pounds;
(c) Three (3) axles in tridem arrangement which are spaced forty-two (42) or more inches apart and less
than one hundred twenty (120) inches apart shall not be more than sixty-five thousand (65,000) pounds;
and
(d) Dual wheel axle with one (1) axle with two (2) wheels on each side of the axle to be considered a dual
wheel axle shall not be more than twenty thousand (20,000) pounds each.
(3) Notwithstanding KRS 189.269, the axle weight limits in subsection (2) of this section shall not apply to a
vehicle transporting fluid milk products under a permit issued under this section.
(4) Each motor vehicle operating pursuant to this section shall comply with the safety provisions set forth in the
administrative regulations promulgated by the department pursuant to this section.
(5)[(4)] The department shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to set
fees for permits established under this section.
(6)[(5)] The department may refuse to issue a permit for a requested route because of the inadequacies of the
roadway or a structure on that route.
Section 6. KRS 189.221 is amended to read as follows:
A person shall not operate on any highway, except those highways designated by the secretary of transportation under
the provisions of KRS 189.222, or those locally maintained highways under the provisions of KRS 189.222(13)[(12)]
or 189.230(4), any of the following trucks, trailers, manufactured homes, or vehicles:
(1) Any motor truck, semitrailer, trailer, manufactured home, or vehicle which exceeds eleven and one-half (11-
1/2) feet in height or ninety-six (96) inches in width, including any part of the body or load;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

10 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(2) Any motor truck, except a semitrailer truck, which exceeds twenty-six and one half (26-1/2) feet in length,
including any part of the body or load;
(3) Any semitrailer truck which exceeds thirty (30) feet in length, including any part of the body or load;
(4) Any truck, semitrailer truck, or truck and trailer unit which exceeds 36,000 pounds gross weight, including the
load;
(5) Any truck, semitrailer truck, or tractor-trailer unit which exceeds a gross weight equal to the sum of six
hundred (600) pounds per inch of the combined width of the tires upon which the vehicle may be propelled,
but no more than thirty-six thousand (36,000) pounds; and
(6) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, any truck hauling building materials under KRS 189.2226, or
to a road construction project on a highway rated less than the maximum weight provided above, may haul up
to eighty thousand (80,000) pounds gross weight, including the load, without a permit.
Signed by Governor April 13, 2026.